Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Article 1. In General

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 67, § 1, effective July 1, 2006, provides:

“For the period commencing July 1, 2006 and ending June 30, 2008, services authorized under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act involving the delivery of a child, including prenatal and postpartum care related to the delivery, shall be reimbursed at ninety percent (90%) of the statewide average of the physician's specialty for the services provided as of July 1, 2006, not to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the provider's usual and customary billed charges. This reimbursement rate shall apply if the service was rendered during the period commencing July 1, 2006 and ending June 30, 2008. To be eligible for the increased reimbursement rate provided by this act, a provider shall offer to the patient or refer the patient to prenatal health programs developed by the department of health and identified for this purpose by the department in its rules and regulations.”

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1, directs that for the period beginning July 1, 2004, and ending June 30, 2006, services authorized under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act involving the delivery of a child, including prenatal and postpartum care related to the delivery, are to be reimbursed at 90% of the statewide average of the physician's specialty for the services provided as of July 1, 2004, not to exceed 100% of the provider's usual and customary billed charges.

Laws 2004, ch. 101, § 1, as amended by Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 3, provides:

For the provisions of section 1 (a) through (c), see the 2004 Wyoming session Laws.

Laws 2004, ch. 101, § 2, as amended by Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2, appropriates $200,000 from the general fund to the department of health for the purposes of this act for the purchase of tail coverage, which is to remain available for expenditure until June 30, 2006.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 4, directs the department of health to report the additional costs incurred by the increased reimbursement rate under the act and recommendations for modifications to the reimbursement rate for obstetric services under the Medical Assistance and Services Act to the joint appropriations interim committee on or before October 31, 2005.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 5, directs that the $3,000,000 appropriated to the department of health under Laws 2004, ch. 101, § 2, be deappropriated and deposited in the general fund. Section 5 further directs that for the purposes of Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., Act 2, $2,050,000 is to be appropriated from the general fund and $2,600,00 from federal funds to the department of health for the period July 1, 2004 through June 30, 2006.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 6, makes this section effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 17, 2004.

Laws 2013, ch. 117, § 1 directs “(a) The department of health shall proceed with a reform and redesign of the Wyoming Medicaid program to include the following elements that were identified by the department in its final report on the Medicaid options study performed pursuant to 2012 Wyoming Laws, Chapter 103: (i) Concerning all health care and waiver services, the department shall, to the extent practical, implement: (A) Use of incentives to encourage recipients to engage in designated activities or behaviors to achieve and maintain a healthy lifestyle; (B) Use of incentives to encourage health care providers to meet identified, measurable performance outcomes in the provision of health care; (C) Decreased use of emergency rooms for nonemergency care by such methods as a nurse triage hotline, targeted education and increased monitoring for excessive utilization and inappropriate drug seeking behavior; (D) An evaluation of enhanced use of managed care using tiers of services and more intense management for high cost clients. The department shall explore the use of managed care for all or a designated part of the Medicaid population, with the goal of delivering care of the same or better quality as currently delivered but at reduced cost. The managed care plan shall include identification of goals, outcome measurements and evaluation tools. The department may initiate the process of federal approval for necessary state plan amendments; (E) Inclusion of supplementary services at the time a prospective client applies for Medicaid benefits, such as referrals to other benefit programs and job training resources; (F) Expansion of prenatal services to all women whose children are likely to be eligible for Medicaid; (G) Expansion of available behavioral health services, with particular attention to persons with serious and persistent mental illness or serious psychological distress; (H) Increased fraud prevention and reduction activities; (J) Use of a capitated payment model instead of a fee-for-service payment model for some health care providers, including predetermined bundled payments for specific health events or time periods; (K) Use of health homes to coordinate patient care; (M) Screening, brief intervention and referral for treatment for pregnancy and maternity care; (N) Enhanced healthcare management for foster care children. (ii) Concerning long term care services, the department shall, to the extent practical, implement: (A) Development of an assessment tool to replace the "Assessment of Medical Necessity for Long Term Care" required by
W.S.

42-6-102

; (B) Redesign of nursing facility reimbursements to reflect patient acuity, percentage of Medicaid occupancy and regional economic factors; (C) Elimination of the caps on the number of clients admitted to the long term care and assisted living facility waiver programs. The objective shall be to optimize the services provided to current clients and to extend appropriate services to persons currently on waiting lists for waiver services within the current budget. (iii) Concerning developmental disability and acquired brain injury services, the department shall, to the extent practical, implement: (A) Creation of two (2) separate waiver programs, including one (1) for supportive services and one (1) for comprehensive services. The objective shall be to optimize the services provided to current clients and to extend appropriate services to persons currently on waiting lists for waiver services within the current budget; (B) Creation of individual budget amounts for each person served on the waivers to reflect assessed individual needs in consultation with the clients' guardians, and as appropriate, current case managers and providers; (C) Replacement where possible of higher cost residential and day habilitation services with lower cost, more integrated services; (D) The department shall develop a plan to determine the needs of individual clients, placement options and continuum of care that recognizes change of need and change of circumstances over time; (E) Provide for a case management system for the waiver programs that is free of conflicts of interest. (b) The department shall hold at least two (2) informational meetings to provide opportunities for clients, guardians and service providers affected by the program changes proposed in paragraph (a)(iii) of this section to provide testimony. The department shall provide notice to those clients, guardians and service providers at least two (2) weeks prior to each meeting. (c) The department of health shall make a preliminary report by October 1, 2013 and a final report by October 1, 2014 to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee regarding the status of the reform and redesign of the Medicaid program pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. The report shall separately identify those items that have been implemented or are scheduled for implementation and those items that are contingent on a state Medicaid plan amendment or approval of a waiver by the centers for Medicare and Medicaid services. To the extent practicable, the report shall include an estimate of the costs or savings associated with each reform and redesign item.”

Laws 2013, ch. 117, § 3 directs “(a) There is appropriated one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000.00) from the general fund to the department of health. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2014. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of studying and developing an implementation plan for Medicaid reform pursuant to this act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2014. This appropriation shall not be included in the department's 2015-2016 standard biennial budget request. (b) The department of health shall have the authority to contract with experts and consultants as may be useful in conducting any study provided for in this act. In contracting for services with experts and consultants for purposes of conducting any study, the department shall be exempt from the procurement requirements set out in
W.S.

9-2-1016

and any other state laws, rules or policies governing the procurement of services by a state agency other than the requirement for approval of those contracts by the attorney general. This exemption shall expire on June 30, 2014 or upon completion of the study, whichever occurs first.”

§ 42-4-101.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act”. The program and services provided pursuant to this chapter and Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act may be cited as “Medicaid” or the “Medicaid program”.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 42-64; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 2007, ch. 219, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to the state department of health being entitled to a copy of the application for a decree to establish the right and title to real property, see §

2-1-205

.

As to public health nursing infant home visitation subprogram, see §

35-27-101

et seq.

The 2007 amendment

added the second sentence.

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2007.

Social Security Act. —

Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in subsection (b)(iv), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.

Res Judicata. —

Pharmacist's contention that the district court improperly applied res judicata when the Medicaid rules did not allow him to request an administrative hearing was without merit because the pharmacist was entitled to an administrative hearing, and the pharmacist was advised that he was so entitled. The pharmacist requested an administrative hearing and then, for reasons not apparent in the record, withdrew his request.
Burke v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2009 WY 138, 219 P.3d 122,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2009).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Department of Health v. Dairyland Ins. Co., 11 P.3d 348,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 2000); Mt. Reg'l Servs. v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2014 WY 69,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(May 29, 2014); Gheen v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2014 WY 70,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(May 30, 2014); Adekale v. State, 2015 WY 30,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Feb. 26, 2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of evidence when evaluating mental impairment in social security disability case under 20 C.F.R. § 404.1520a, 166 ALR Fed 361.

§ 42-4-102.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Categorically eligible” means any individual in need of medical assistance authorized by the legislature and by Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act to be covered by a state plan for medical assistance and services;

“Medical assistance” means partial or full payment of the reasonable charges assessed by any authorized provider of the services and supplies enumerated under W.S.

42-4-103

and consistent with limitations and reimbursement methodologies established by the department, which are provided on behalf of a qualified recipient, excluding those services and supplies provided by any relative of the recipient, unless the relative is a family caregiver providing services through a corporation or a limited liability company, which corporation or limited liability company the relative may own, under a home and community based waiver program, or for cosmetic purposes only;

“Qualified” means any categorically eligible individual satisfying eligibility criteria imposed by this chapter, the state plan for medical assistance and services and by rule and regulation of the department;

“Relative” means any person as defined by department rule and regulation;

“Resident” means any individual residing in this state, including any individual temporarily absent from this state;

“Institutionalized spouse” means as defined by the Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988, P.L. 100-360;

“Department” means the state department of health;

“Direct patient care personnel” means only:

Certified nursing assistants;

Licensed practical nurses;

Registered nurses.

“Skilled nursing home extraordinary care” means skilled nursing home services clearly exceeding standard skilled nursing home services and meeting the criteria established by the department pursuant to W.S. 42-4-104(d);

“Intermediate care facility for people with intellectual disability” means “intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded” or “ICFMR” or “ICFs/MR” as those terms are used in federal law and in other laws, rules and regulations;

“Family caregiver” means a relative of a waiver recipient with a developmental disability or acquired brain injury, who provides waiver services through a corporation or a limited liability company, which corporation or limited liability company the relative may own, to the person with a developmental disability or acquired brain injury and who meets the requirements for a qualified family caregiver as established by rules promulgated by the department. Family caregivers shall be certified by the department in the same manner as nonfamily caregivers. For purposes of providing for reimbursement of services to a family caregiver, the department shall amend the state plan and apply for a waiver from the centers for Medicaid and Medicare services, as necessary;

“Intentional” means that a person, with respect to information, intended to act in violation of the law;

“Knowing” or “knowingly” includes intentional or intentionally and means that a person, with respect to information, acts:

With actual knowledge of the information;

In deliberate ignorance of the truth or falsity of the information; or

In reckless disregard of the truth or falsity of the information.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 238, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 42-66; Laws 1969, ch. 38, § 1; 1973, ch. 53, § 1; ch. 75, § 1; ch. 110, § 1; 1975, ch. 28, § 1; 1976, ch. 2, § 1; 1977, ch. 18, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

6-5-201

,

42-4-103

; Laws 1980, ch. 28, § 1; ch. 29, § 1; 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 23, § 1; 1985, ch. 165, § 1; 1986, ch. 30, § 1; ch. 79, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1990, ch. 65, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 63, § 1; 2008, ch. 70, § 1; 2011, ch. 164, § 1; 2013 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2008 amendment,

added (a)(x).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

in (a)(ii), inserted “unless the relative is a family caregiver providing services through a corporation or a limited liability company, which corporation or limited liability company the relative may own, under a home and community based waiver program”; and added (a)(xi).

Laws 2011, ch. 164 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(xii) and (a)(xiii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Social Security Act. —

Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in subsection (a)(i), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.

Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act. —

The federal Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act, referred to in this section, appears as varied sections throughout 5, 26 and 42 U.S.C.

Quoted in

Adekale v. State, 2015 WY 30,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Feb.
26, 2015).

§ 42-4-103.
Authorized services and supplies.

Services and supplies authorized for medical assistance under this chapter include:

Inpatient hospital services;

Outpatient hospital services;

Laboratory and x-ray services;

Skilled nursing home services;

The professional services of a licensed and certified physician, osteopathic physician or chiropractic doctor;

Home health services;

Family planning services;

Services provided by an authorized rural health care clinic;

Midwife services provided by a:

Certified nurse midwife licensed by the board of nursing;

Midwife licensed by the board of midwifery.

Early and periodic screening, diagnosis and treatment for individuals who have not attained the age of twenty-one (21) years in accordance with Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act;

Premiums, deductibles and coinsurance under federal Medicare Part A, hospital insurance, and Part B, supplemental medical insurance;

The professional services of a licensed optometrist;

Prescription drugs and oxygen;

Prosthetic devices which are necessary to replace a missing portion of the body or assist in correcting a dysfunctional portion of the body including training required to implement the use of the device but excluding dental prostheses;

Licensed rehabilitation center services and if specifically prescribed by a licensed physician, outpatient services of a privately operated licensed occupational, speech, audiology or physical therapy center and the professional services of a licensed occupational therapist, licensed speech pathologist, licensed audiologist or a licensed physical therapist;

Services provided by an institution for mental illnesses;

Services provided under a federal home and community based waiver;

The professional services of a licensed dentist which may be legally and alternatively performed by a licensed physician or osteopathic physician and except as provided under paragraph (a)(x) of this section, which are not primarily provided for the care, treatment or replacement of teeth or structures directly supporting teeth;

Services provided by a freestanding ambulatory surgical center;

Services provided by a certified mental health center or community substance abuse treatment center; mental health services provided to qualified recipients by a licensed physician or under the direction of a physician if an individual treatment plan is established in writing, approved and periodically reviewed by a licensed physician; services provided by a licensed mental health professional. Authorized services shall include services provided by a person holding a provisional license as a mental health professional if the services were provided under the supervision of a licensed mental health professional. The department of health shall by rule and regulation or within the state plan for medical assistance and services, define those services qualifying as mental health services under this paragraph and, pursuant to W.S.

9-2-102

, establish standards for certification under this paragraph. As used in this paragraph “licensed mental health professional” means a licensed professional counselor, a licensed marriage and family therapist, a licensed addictions therapist or a licensed clinical social worker;

Services provided by intermediate care facilities;

Services provided by an intermediate care facility as defined under 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(d);

Services provided by freestanding end stage renal dialysis clinics or centers;

Services provided by advanced practitioners of nursing;

Hospice care as defined in W.S. 35-2-901(a)(xii) and authorized under 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(VII) including hospice care in a hospice facility for an eligible individual and room and board for individuals receiving the care in a hospice facility. Reimbursement rates for hospice care shall be set annually to match Medicare hospice reimbursement rates. The room and board reimbursement rate for hospice facilities shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the statewide average of the Medicaid nursing home room and board rate. For the purposes of this paragraph, “eligible individual” means a person who is eligible for hospice care as defined in the state Medicaid plan in effect on July 1, 2012;

Tuberculosis ambulatory care authorized under 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XII);

Targeted case management services, which shall be services which will assist targeted individuals eligible under the state plan in gaining access to needed medical, social, educational and other services;

Skilled nursing home extraordinary care in accordance with W.S. 42-4-104(d);

Bone marrow, kidney and liver transplant services;

Programs and services provided under the school health program;

Services of a licensed dietitian;

Air ambulance transport services, consistent with W.S.

42-4-123

;

Clubhouse rehabilitation services in accordance with W.S.

42-4-124

;

The professional services of a school psychologist;

The professional services of a school social worker;

School based services delivered pursuant to an individualized education program, including services:

Provided by an otherwise enrolled Medicaid provider type;

Provided by a licensed professional in a school setting; or

Otherwise covered under this chapter to support delivery of special education programs and services.

In addition to other payments authorized under this chapter, the department may provide payments to skilled nursing homes which are providing services covered under this chapter if:

The nursing home demonstrates that one hundred percent (100%) of the additional amount received will be expended upon direct patient care personnel salaries and benefits; and

The nursing home agrees to provide sufficient data to the department substantiating compliance with paragraph (i) of this subsection.

For purposes of implementing Medicaid reform pursuant to 2013 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 117, the department may apply for any applicable waivers or permissions to allow exceptions to federal conflict free case management definitions for frontier and rural areas, which to the extent consistent with federal law, shall implement a system using a neutral third party to ensure no conflicts exist. Consistent with federal law, the department may phase in the independent case management system. In negotiating a waiver pursuant to this subsection, the department shall, to the extent practicable and approved by the center for Medicare and Medicaid services:

Allow an individual or agency to provide case management and direct services to discrete clients if the services are provided under conflict free circumstances;

When implementing updated case manager educational standards, provide for a three (3) year transition period and allow credit for prior case manager experience.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 238, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 42-66; Laws 1969, ch. 38, § 1; 1973, ch. 53, § 1; ch. 75, § 1; ch. 110, § 1; 1975, ch. 28, § 1; 1976, ch. 2, § 1; 1977, ch. 18, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

6-5-201

,

42-4-103

; Laws 1980, ch. 28, § 1; ch. 29, § 1; 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 23, § 1; 1985, ch. 165, § 1; 1986, ch. 30, § 1; ch. 79, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1989, ch. 162, § 1; 1990, ch. 57, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1992, ch. 47, § 1; ch. 64, § 1; 1994, ch. 40, § 1; ch. 54, § 1; 1995, ch. 126, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 1; ch. 63, § 1; 2003, ch. 92, § 1; 2004, ch. 43, § 1; ch. 111, § 1; 2009, ch. 152, § 1; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2013 ch. 111, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 111, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2014 ch. 45, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2015 ch. 64, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 46, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 87, § 2, effective April 1, 2020; 2019 ch. 189, § 3, effective April 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2004, added (a)(xxix).

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 111, § 1, added (a)(xxix) (now (a)(xxx)).

Laws 2004, ch. 111, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2004.

The 2009 amendment,

effective
July 1, 2009, in (a)(xv), inserted “speech, audiology”
preceding “or physical therapy center” and inserted
“licensed speech pathologist, licensed audiologist”
preceding “or a licensed physical therapist.”

The 2012 amendment,

substituted
“42 U.S.C. § 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(VII)” for “42 U.S.C. § 1396a(a)(10)(ii)(VII)” in (a)(xxv).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes
the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013,
added the language beginning “including hospice care”
in (a)(xxv).

The 2014 amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, by ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2014, added (c).

The second 2014 amendment, by ch 111, §
1, in the first sentence of (a)(xx), substituted “community substance abuse treatment center” for “clinic,” deleted “certified,” and added “and services furnished by a licensed professional counselor, a licensed marriage and family therapist, a licensed additions therapist or a licensed clinical social worker.”

Laws 2014, ch. 111, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, §
8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added (a)(xxxi).

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(ix) substituted "Midwife" for "Nurse", added a proviso at the end, and added (a)(ix)(A) and (B).

The second 2019 amendment, effective April 1, 2020, added (a)(xxxii) (now (a)(xxxiii)).

The third 2019 amendment, effective April 1, 2020, added (a)(xxxii).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(xxxiv) through (a)(xxxvi).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 6, effective June 30, 1990, repealed subsection (a)(xxiii).

Laws 1990, ch. 57, § 6, repealed Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 6.

Laws 2004, ch. 43, § 1, and ch. 111, § 1 both enacted a paragraph (a)(xxix). The provisions added by ch. 111 have been redesignated as paragraph (a)(xxx) at the direction of the legislative service office.

Laws 2013, ch. 111, § 2,
directs:
“The department of health shall submit as
part of its budget
request for the 2015-2016 biennial budget a new
unit number for
the
services and supplies authorized by this act.
The new unit
number
shall contain an appropriation from the general
fund which
shall
be
deducted from one (1) or more units within the
department's
budget,
providing for the movement of general funds
which is expense
neutral.”

Medicare. —

Parts A and B of federal Medicare, referred to in subsection (a)(xi), appear as 42 U.S.C. §§ 1395c through 1395i-5, and 42 U.S.C. §§ 1395j through 1395w-4, respectively.

Social Security Act. —

Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in subsection (a)(x), appears as 42 U.S.C. §§ 1396 through 1396u.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 43, § 2, provides that in addition to any other appropriation to implement the medical assistance and services program, there is appropriated to the department of health for the biennium beginning July 1, 2004, $458,426 from the general fund and $629,182 from federal funds for the purpose of implementing W.S. 42-4-103(a)(xxix).

Cited in

Adekale v. State, 2015 WY 30,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Feb. 26, 2015).